Georgia, session 2025_26, SB321.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 34-9-2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to applicability of
workers' compensation to employers and employees generally, is amended by adding a new
subsection to read as follows:
"(g) This chapter shall not apply to employees of an employer covered by and providing
coverage under the federal Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act, 33 U.S.C.
Section 901, et seq., as amended, and its extensions."
S. B. 321
- 1 -

LC 28 0682
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 321
- 2 -